Utah statutes.
59-1-1403.   Commission to collect a tax, fee, or charge -- Receipt for tax,
fee, or charge paid -- Additional remedies -- Collection agents and counsel --
Action by attorney general or county attorney -- Commission rulemaking
authority.
(1)  Except as otherwise provided in this title, the commission shall collect
a tax, fee, or charge.
(2)  The commission may designate an agent to collect a tax, fee, or charge.
(3)  The commission shall, upon request, give a receipt for a tax, fee, or
charge the commission collects.
(4) (a)  A remedy provided in this part is in addition to other existing
remedies.
(b)  An action taken by the commission may not be construed to be an election
on the part of the state or an officer of the state to pursue a remedy under
this part to the exclusion of another remedy.
(5)  The commission may:
(a)  retain counsel for the purpose of collecting an amount the commission
assesses against a person who is not a resident of this state;
(b)  establish the compensation of an agent described in Subsection (2) or
counsel described in Subsection (5)(a) to be paid out of money appropriated or
otherwise lawfully available for payment to the agent or counsel; and
(c)  require a bond or other security for an agent described in Subsection (2)
or counsel described in Subsection (5)(a) in a form and amount the commission
considers appropriate.
(6) (a)  The commission shall represent the state in a matter pertaining to
the collection of a tax, fee, or charge.
(b)  The commission may institute a proceeding to enforce a judgment allowing
for the collection of a liability in the district court of a county in which
is located a portion of property against which collection is sought.
(c)  For purposes of Subsection (6)(b), the commission may request that the
following assist the commission:
(i)  the attorney general; or
(ii)  a county attorney.
(7)  In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking
Act, the commission may by rule establish a collection procedure:
(a)  in addition to the methods of collecting a liability provided in this
title;
(b)  that is consistent with this part;
(c)  that uses a return, warrant, or other reasonable document or method; and
(d)  that is necessary in collecting a liability.
